Connecticut, session 2026, SB00172.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate six
hundred thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the
Department of Economic and Community Development for the purpose
of providing a grant-in-aid to St. Mary of the Immaculate Conception in
the village of Baltic in the town of Sprague for renovations to the bell
tower and other structures.